New York, session 2025-2026, S1111.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3602- 2 eee to read as follows: 3 § 3602-eee. Combination pre-kindergarten and daycare programs. 1. For 4 the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the follow- 5 ing meanings: 6 (a) "Pre-kindergarten program" means any pre-kindergarten program 7 operating pursuant to section thirty-six hundred two-e or thirty-six 8 hundred two-ee of this part, or any other rule or regulation promulgated 9 by the department. 10 (b) "Daycare program" means any child day care, as such term is 11 defined by section three hundred ninety of the social services law. 12 2. The department, in conjunction with the office of children and 13 family services, shall create a single, streamlined process whereby a 14 facility or program operating both a pre-kindergarten program and a 15 daycare program may apply for and receive any certification, licensing, 16 or other requirement otherwise necessary to operate a pre-kindergarten 17 program or daycare program under the laws of the state. 18 3. The department and the office of children and family services shall 19 be authorized to promulgate any rules and/or regulations necessary to 20 effectuate the provisions of this section. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 23 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 24 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 25 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03643-01-5